Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS, APPROPRIATION MODIFICATIONS, AND CANCELLATIONS Section 1. new text begin WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin The amounts specified in the following subdivisions are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the purposes specified in each subdivision. The appropriations are in fiscal year 2027 and onetime. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.98, subdivision 14, and 116J.035, subdivision 7, the commissioner may use up to three percent of the amounts appropriated for administrative costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Wallin Educational Partners. new text end new text begin $100,000 is for a grant to Wallin Education Partners to support its career development program, which provides career exploration, skill building, mentoring, direct talent pipeline development, and early employment readiness for underresourced participants. Money may also be used to expand Wallin's construction and health care pathways programs, which offer advising, hands-on learning, and work-based experience to prepare participants for careers in construction and health care. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin New Pathways. new text end new text begin $130,000 is for a grant to New Pathways in Cambridge to support preemployment and job readiness programming for families with children experiencing homelessness. Money may be used to provide individualized employment preparation, resume and job application assistance, interview readiness, and connections to local employers and training programs. This programming must help parents overcome barriers to employment while working toward stable housing and self-sufficiency through case management, family education, and partnerships with community resources. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin People Serving People. new text end new text begin $250,000 is for a grant to People Serving People in Minneapolis to provide preemployment and job readiness services for parents and adults experiencing homelessness. Money may be used for resume and cover letter writing support, job search and application assistance, mock interviews, interview and work clothing, uniform and licensure fee assistance, technology access, financial fitness classes, and child care and transportation support to help families overcome barriers to employment, achieve financial stability, and build pathways to long-term self-sufficiency. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Local News Talent Pipeline Program. new text end new text begin $250,000 is for a grant to the Minnesota News Media Institute for a local news talent pipeline program, a statewide initiative to encourage Minnesotans to seek careers in journalism and local news operations and strengthen the capacity of Minnesota news outlets. Grant money must be used by the recipients to provide paid internships with Minnesota newspapers, television and radio broadcasters, and digital news platforms for individuals to gain experience in reporting, editing, media design, and other operational functions. To the extent practicable, Minnesota News Media Institute should seek a balanced geographic distribution of grants and allocation of grants across different news mediums. Minnesota News Media Institute must consult with local Minnesota-based news organization associations, including the Minnesota Broadcasters Association and Minnesota Newspaper Association, on the administration of the grant program. Minnesota News Media Institute may retain up to five percent of funding to cover administrative expenses of operating the grant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Appetite for Change. new text end new text begin $150,000 is for a grant to Appetite For Change for the Youth Training and Opportunities Program to provide workforce training for local youth in urban agriculture, culinary arts, and leadership development. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin 180 Degrees. new text end new text begin $250,000 is for a grant to 180 Degrees, serving teens in Hennepin, Ramsey, Stearns, Carver, and Olmsted Counties and surrounding areas, to support youth and young adult employment readiness and exposure to career opportunities. Money may be used for career exploration, resume development, mock interviews, and work readiness training that fosters hope, self-sufficiency, and positive career pathways for young people at risk of or experiencing homelessness, helping them break cycles of poverty and avoid exploitation or chronic instability. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin The Cookie Cart. new text end new text begin $300,000 is for a grant to The Cookie Cart for earn and learn workforce training for youth ages 14 to 18 by providing life, leadership, and employment skills through on-the-job and classroom experiences in a nonprofit bakery. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Hmong American Partnership. new text end new text begin $500,000 is for a grant to the Hmong American Partnership for job training and employment services. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Getting to Work Grant Program. new text end new text begin $1,000,000 is for the getting to work grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.545. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENTERPRISE MINNESOTA, INC.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc. to directly invest in Minnesota manufacturers under the Made in Minnesota program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116O.115, and for operations of Enterprise Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.98, subdivision 14, and 116J.035, subdivision 7, the commissioner may use up to two percent of the amount appropriated for administrative costs. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; IGNITE BUSINESSWOMEN INVESTMENT GROUP FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Ignite Businesswomen Investment Group Foundation to provide capacity building and business development support for women entrepreneurs. Money appropriated under this section must be used to provide: new text end new text begin (1) business planning, leadership development, financial literacy, technology training, and marketing support; and new text end new text begin (2) grants to community-based organizations specializing in women-focused entrepreneurship support. new text end new text begin This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.98, subdivision 14, and 116J.035, subdivision 7, the commissioner may use up to two percent of the amount appropriated for administrative costs. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AUTOMOTIVE COMPONENT MANUFACTURER.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to a Minnesota-based automotive component manufacturer and distributor specializing in electric vehicles and sensor technology that manufactures all of their parts onshore to expand their manufacturing. The grant recipient under this section shall submit reports on the uses of the money appropriated, the number of jobs created due to the appropriation, wage information, and the city and state in which the additional manufacturing activity was located to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development. A final report is due by February 1, 2028. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.98, subdivision 14, and 116J.035, subdivision 7, the commissioner may use up to two percent of the amount appropriated for administrative costs. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROFESSIONAL GOLFERS' ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA (PGA) CHAMPIONSHIP EVENTS.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to the city of Chaska to attract, and for costs associated with hosting, a package of future PGA of America championship-level events, which shall include at least one men's PGA championship and one women's PGA championship. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2029. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the director may use up to two percent of the amount appropriated for administrative costs. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin RURAL CANCER INSTITUTE PILOT PROGRAM APPROPRIATION MODIFICATION.new text end new text begin (a) The appropriation for the Rural Cancer Institute pilot program in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (bbb), must prioritize Minnesota clinicians and students. The Rural Cancer Institute may work with clinicians and students from elsewhere in the United States if the clinician or student receives the recommendation of a practicing Minnesota oncologist and all care is provided in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriations in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for the Rural Cancer Institute pilot program in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (bbb), are available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin CANCELLATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The unobligated amount remaining from the appropriation in Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 11, section 42, is canceled. new text end new text begin (b) $4,633,000 of the fiscal year 2024 Minnesota forward fund account appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 53, article 21, section 7, paragraph (c), is canceled. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $4,633,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the Minnesota forward fund account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8752, subdivision 3, to the general fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end ARTICLE 2 MISCELLANEOUS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section and section 480.45, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Judicial official" means: (1) every Minnesota district court judge, senior judge, retired judge, and every judge of the Minnesota Court of Appeals and every active, senior, recalled, or retired federal judge who resides in Minnesota; (2) a current or retired justice of the Minnesota Supreme Court; (3) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch; (4) judicial referees and magistrate judges; and (5) current and retired judges and current employees of the Office of Administrative Hearings, new text begin Department of Employment and Economic Development Unemployment Insurance and Paid Leave Appeals Divisions, new text end Department of Human Services Appeals Division, Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, and Tax Court. (c) "Personal information" does not include publicly available information. Personal information means: (1) a residential address of a judicial official; (2) a residential address of the spouse, domestic partner, or children of a judicial official; (3) a nonjudicial branch issued telephone number or email address of a judicial official; (4) the name of any child of a judicial official; and (5) the name of any child care facility or school that is attended by a child of a judicial official if combined with an assertion that the named facility or school is attended by the child of a judicial official. (d) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by a judicial official, or by a person to whom the judicial official has disclosed the information, unless the judicial official has restricted the information to a specific audience. (e) "Law enforcement support organizations" do not include charitable organizations. (f) "Real property records" has the meaning given in section 480.50, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.50, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "County recorder" has the meaning given in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (4). (c) "Government entity" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. (d) "Judicial official" has the meaning given in section 480.40, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), except that it does not include: (1) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch, the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, or the Tax Court; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) judges or employees in the Department of Human Services Appeals Divisionnew text begin ; or (3) judges or employees in the Department of Employment and Economic Development Unemployment Insurance and Paid Leave Appeals Divisionsnew text end . (e) "Personal information" has the meaning given in section 480.40, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). (f) "Real property records" means any of the following: (1) real property records as defined in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (5); (2) Uniform Commercial Code filings and tax liens maintained by the Secretary of State; and (3) any other records maintained by a county recorder or other government entity evidencing title to, or any lien, judgment, or other encumbrance on, real or personal property. (g) "Responsible authority" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 16.